Wyoming, session 2025, HB0229.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

HB0229

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0366
Section 1. W.S. 36-8-1801 and 36-8-1802 are created
to read:

ARTICLE 18
HIGH PLAINS RESEARCH STATION AND ARBORETUM
STATE HISTORIC SITE

36-8-1801. High Plains Research Station and Arboretum
state historic site; strategic master plan; leasehold and
concession agreements.

(a) The lands in Laramie County managed by the
department of state parks and cultural resources and known
as the High Plains Research Station and Arboretum are
declared to be a state historic site. The department shall
by rule specify the legal description of the state historic
site.

(b) The state historic site shall be known as the
"High Plains Research Station and Arboretum state historic
site".

HB0229

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0366
(c) The department of state parks and cultural
resources shall prepare a strategic master plan for the
preservation and operation of the High Plains Research
Station and Arboretum state historic site. Under the
strategic master plan required by this subsection, the
department may develop memoranda of understanding with any
city, town, county, department, political subdivision,
state agency or other entity, as necessary, to administer,
operate, maintain, preserve and study the state historic
site.

(d) The department of state parks and cultural
resources is authorized to enter into leasehold and
concession agreements in accordance with the strategic
master plan required by subsection (c) of this section.
Funds received by the department pursuant to this
subsection shall be deposited into the state parks account
and subject to the requirements of W.S. 36-4-121(h).

36-8-1802. Administration; fees.

(a) The department of state parks and cultural
resources shall preserve, administer, operate and maintain
HB0229

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0366
the High Plains Research Station and Arboretum state
historic site in accordance with the strategic master plan
required by W.S. 36-8-1801(c).

(b) The department may, under a lease agreement or
contract management arrangement, provide for special events
at the historic site in accordance with W.S. 36-4-121(o) or
management of specified areas of the historic site by a
public or private entity.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
department of state parks and cultural resources may impose
fees in excess of permit fees charged for use of state
parks and sites under W.S. 36-4-121 as necessary to fund
expenses incurred for preservation, development,
operations, personnel and maintenance of the High Plains
Research Station and Arboretum state historic site.
Unexpended, unobligated fees collected under this
subsection shall be deposited in the state parks account at
the end of the fiscal year and expended in accordance with
W.S. 36-4-121(h). Revenues and expenditures under this
subsection for each of the immediately preceding two (2)
HB0229

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0366
fiscal years shall be reported within the department's
biennial budget request submitted under W.S. 9-2-1013.

Section 2. The department of state parks and cultural
resources shall initiate the strategic master plan required
by this act within one (1) year following the effective
date of this act and provide a report on the strategic
master plan to the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and
cultural resources interim committee not later than October
1, 2026.

Section 3. Three million three hundred thirty-eight
thousand seven hundred fifty-six dollars ($3,338,756.00) or
as much thereof as is available from amounts appropriated
to the department of state parks and cultural resources for
the high plains research station and arboretum by 2024
Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 118, Section 2, Section 24,
Footnote 7 may be expended for the purposes of the High
Plains Research Station and Arboretum state historic site,
as created in Section 1 of this act.

HB0229

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0366
Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0229